District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.85

Repealed

Voluntary dissolution proceedings — Effect of statement of revocation.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 215, ch. 269, § 85
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.85.
1981 Ed., § 29-385.
1973 Ed., § 29-930i.